src/fst/morphology/affixes/inflections-nouns.lexc
LEXICON ZseqZ !!= * @CODE@ qalaseq
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>gasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>g2 HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>g2ip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>g2issaar IV_r_stem ;
+GIIP@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>g2iip@U.Num.Pl@ XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:%>%VTRUNCiiar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>%TRUNCerniar IV_r ; !+IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCerup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KILLI+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkilli XIi_voqXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>%TRUNCliar IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCler XIirXmorf_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCler HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>ler XIirXmorf_stem ;
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:%>%TRUNClerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCleri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>%TRUNClersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>%TRUNClisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNClior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCliuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>lup IV_k_stem ;
+LUP+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>%TRUNClup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>%TRUNCnngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCnngorsar DOTR_IV_r ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrpalup IV_k ;
+QAR@C.Num@+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCqar@C.Num@ IV_r_stem ;
+RSUR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCrsor IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>si XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>sior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>siuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCssaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+SSIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCssip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
+SSIP+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCssip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>tu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>tor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu IV_voq ;
+USAAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCusaar IV_r_stem ;
+N+Abs+Sg: Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl:%>%CVqTRUNCtsit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>g2a Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCt Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCa Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCsaa Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsini Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCni Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss+TTAAQ:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinissaaq # ;
+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss+TTAAQ+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnissaaq # ;
+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsikka K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCkka K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsitit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCi K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCsai Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsini K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCni K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Arch:%>%CVqTRUNCtsi K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>put Krestr ; !ZseqZ 
+N+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>si Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCat Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCsaat Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>tik Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsivut K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtvut K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCtsigut K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCgut K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsisi K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCsi K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCi K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCsaat Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCsai Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsitik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsisik Krestr ;
+N+Rel+Pl:%>%CVqTRUNCtsit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCt K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsip Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCp Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsima Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCma Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsivit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCvit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCata Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCsaata Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimi Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCmi Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsima K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCma K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>simma K_plur ;
+N+Rel+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsivit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCisa K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCsaasa Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimi K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCmi K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsitta Krestr ; !ZseqZ 
+N+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtta Krestr ; !ZseqZ 
+N+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsissi Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCata Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCsaata Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimik Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCmik Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsitta K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtta K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsissi K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssi K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCisa K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCsaasa Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>TRUNCmik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>mut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCmut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Youth:%>%TRUNCnnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ !qungasinnut
+N+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCrnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCsaanut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCrnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCinut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsitsinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ 
+N+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ !liv 170421
+N+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsissinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCsaannut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsitsinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsissinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>nut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ 
+N+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminnut TrmVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCmit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>mit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>nit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCrnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCanit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCrnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCinit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsitsinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsissinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCannit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsitsinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsissinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCit%POSSESSORTRUNC%>nit AblVb ; !ZseqZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminnit AblVb ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg:%>%CVqTRUNCtsimiit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCmiit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>miit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiniit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiniik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCniit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCniik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>niit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>niik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinniit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinniik Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniik Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinniit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinniik Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCrniit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCrniik Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCaniit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCaniik Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminiit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminiik Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminiit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminiik Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinniit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinniik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinniit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCtsinniik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCrniit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCrniik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCiniit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCiniik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminiit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCtsiminiik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminiit K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminiik K_plur ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%CVqTRUNCtsitsinniit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%CVqTRUNCtsitsinniik Krestr ; !ZseqZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinniit Krestr ; !ZseqZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinniik Krestr ; !ZseqZ 
